hr-HR: Materijal zupčanika razvodnika: Bronca; Lijevano željezo; Kompozit/polimer; Kaljeni čelik; Melonizirani čelik; Ostalo
pl: Materiał koła zębatego aparatu zapłonowego: Brąz; Żeliwo; Kompozyt/polimer; Stal hartowana; Stal melonizowana; Inny
fi: Virranjakajan hammaspyörän materiaali: Pronssi; Valurauta; Komposiitti/Polymeeri; Karkaistu teräs; Melonisoitu teräs; Muu
it: materiale degli ingranaggi del distributore: Bronzo; Ghisa; Composito/polimero; Acciaio temprato; Acciaio melonizzato; Altro
cs: Materiál ozubeného kola rozdělovače: Bronz; Litina; Kompozit/polymer; Tvrzená ocel; Melonizovaná ocel; Ostatní
ja: ディストリビューターギアの素材: ブロンズ; 鋳鉄; 複合材/ポリマー; 硬化鋼; メロナイト処理鋼; その他
bg-BG: Материал на зъбното колело на делкото: Бронз; Чугун; Композит/полимер; Закалена стомана; Мелонизирана стомана; Друго
fr: Matériau du pignon d’entraînement de l’allumeur: Bronze; Fonte; Composite/Polymère; Acier trempé; Acier mélonisé; Autre
sv: Material för fördelardrev: Brons; Gjutjärn; Komposit/polymer; Härdat stål; Meloniserat stål; Övrigt
hu: Elosztó fogaskerék anyaga: Bronz; Öntöttvas; Kompozit/polimer; Edzett acél; Melonizált acél; Egyéb
de: Material des Verteilerzahnrads: Bronze; Gusseisen; Verbundstoff/Polymer; Gehärteter Stahl; Melonierter Stahl; Sonstige
tr: Dağıtıcı dişli malzemesi: Bronz; Dökme demir; Kompozit/Polimer; Sertleştirilmiş çelik; Melonize çelik; Diğer
zh-TW: 分電器齒輪材質: 青銅; 鑄鐵; 複合材料/聚合物; 硬化鋼; Melonized 鋼; 其他
da: Materiale til fordelingsgear: Bronze; Støbejern; Komposit/polymer; Hærdet stål; Meloniseret stål; Andet
sk-SK: Materiál rozvodového kolesa: Bronz; Liatina; Kompozit/Polymér; Kalená oceľ; Melonizovaná oceľ; Iné
en: Distributor gear material: Bronze; Cast iron; Composite/Polymer; Hardened steel; Melonized steel; Other
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ผลิตเฟืองจานจ่าย: บรอนซ์; เหล็กหล่อ; คอมโพสิต/โพลิเมอร์; เหล็กกล้าชุบแข็ง; เหล็กกล้าเคลือบ Melonized; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Materialul angrenajului distribuitorului: Bronz; Fontă; Compozit/polimer; Oțel călit; Oțel melonizat; Altele
ko: 배전기 기어 재질: 청동; 주철; 합성물/폴리머; 경화강; 멜로나이징 강; 기타
ru: Материал шестерни трамблера: Бронза; Чугун; Композит/полимер; Закаленная сталь; Мелонированная сталь; Другое
es: Material del engranaje del distribuidor: Bronce; Hierro fundido; Compuesto/Polímero; Acero endurecido; Acero melonizado; Otro
pt-BR: Material da engrenagem do distribuidor: Bronze; Ferro fundido; Compósito/Polímero; Aço endurecido; Aço melonizado; Outro
pt-PT: Material da engrenagem do distribuidor: Bronze; Ferro fundido; Compósito/polímero; Aço endurecido; Aço melonizado; Outro
el: Υλικό γραναζιού διανομέα: Μπρούντζινο; Χυτοσίδηρος; Σύνθετο/Πολυμερές; Σκληρυμένος χάλυβας; Χάλυβας με επεξεργασία melonite; Άλλο
vi: Vật liệu bánh răng bộ phận phân phối: Đồng; Gang; Composite/Polymer; Thép tôi; Thép thấm nitơ (Melonized); Khác
lt-LT: Skirstytuvo krumpliaračio medžiaga: Bronza; Ketus; Kompozitas / polimeras; Grūdintas plienas; Melonizuotas plienas; Kita
sl-SI: Material zobnika razdelilnika: Bron; Litoželezo; Kompozit/polimer; Kaljeno jeklo; Melonizirano jeklo; Drugo
zh-CN: 分电器齿轮材质: 青铜; 铸铁; 复合材料/聚合物; 硬化钢; 渗碳钢; 其他
nl: Distributeur tandwiel materiaal: Brons; Gietijzer; Composiet/Polymeer; Gehard staal; Gemeloniseerd staal; Overig
nb: Materiale for fordelergir: Bronse; Støpejern; Kompositt/polymer; Herdet stål; Melonisert stål; Annet